District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.25

Expired

Certificate of registration

Expired.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-217, §§ 2 to 8, 42 DCR 2209
For temporary reenactment and amendment, on an emergency basis, of the provisions of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Act of 1992, see §§ 2-8 of the Equal opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-65, April 3, 1997, 44 DCR 2437), and see §§ 2-8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-347, May 6, 1998, 45 DCR 2988).
For temporary (225 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-152, September 15, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5023).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-102, April 30, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2793).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-267, May 8, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2986).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-114, May 1, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 2594).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-217, March 17, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 143).
1981 Ed., §§ 1-1152 to 1-1152.6.

Section 9(b) of D.C. Law 9-217 provided that the act shall expire 2 years from the date of its taking effect. D.C. Law 9-217 became effective on March 17, 1993.

Expiration of Law 9-217